Hawaii statutes.
[§302A-632] Additional benefits to certain [school
personnel and] teachers. The department shall provide additional benefits
to grade level chairpersons, department heads, registrars, and librarians in
schools. The department shall also provide additional benefits to teachers
assigned to schools in areas designated as limited environment communities by
the department. [L 1996, c 89, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next